Massachusetts, session 194th, H3468.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 165 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 11E the following section:-  
Section 11F. Any city, town, district or company engaged in supplying water to 
customers shall include a list of all billing discounts available to seniors, veterans or persons with 
disabilities on every water bill to a customer.  
SECTION 2. Section 1D of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-  
All electric and gas bills sent to a retail customer shall include a list of all billing 
discounts available to seniors, veterans or persons with disabilities.  
SECTION 3. Chapter 25C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:-  

of 2 12  Section 10. All bills for services provided to consumers by companies subject to the 
supervision of the department pursuant to section 1 shall include a list of all billing discounts 
available to seniors, veterans or persons with disabilities.